Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-615
Lottery supplies, defined.

Lottery supplies shall mean all tickets, cards, boards, sheets, or other supplies which are used in and are an integral part of the conduct of any lottery activity authorized or regulated under the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 56.